Washington statutes.
RCW 18.11.095

Auction company certificate of registration—Requirements.

Every person, before operating an auction company as defined in RCW 18.11.050, shall obtain an auction company certificate of registration.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, to be licensed as an auction company, a person shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) File with the department a completed application on a form prescribed by the director.

(b) Sign a notarized statement included on the application form that all auctioneers hired by the auction company to do business in the state shall be properly registered under this chapter.

(c) Be registered with the department of revenue pursuant to RCW 82.32.030 and, if an ownership entity other than sole proprietor or general partnership, be registered with the secretary of state.

(d) Pay the auction company registration fee required under the agency rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(e) File with the department an auction company surety bond in the amount and form required by RCW 18.11.121 and the agency rules adopted pursuant to this chapter.

(f) Have no disqualifications under RCW 18.11.160 or 18.235.130.

(2) An auction company shall not be charged a license fee if it is a sole proprietorship or a partnership owned by an auctioneer or auctioneers, each of whom is licensed under this chapter, and if it has in effect a surety bond or bonds or other security approved by the director in the amount that would otherwise be required for an auction company to be granted or to retain a license under RCW 18.11.121.

[ 2019 c 442 s 2; 2002 c 86 s 207; 1987 c 336 s 5; 1986 c 324 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.